Louisiana, session 2026, HB361.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:177(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§177. Reinstatement of registration after suspension
A.(1) The registration of a person whose registration has been suspended by
the registrar of voters pursuant to R.S. 18:176(A) shall be reinstated by the registrar
upon submission of a voter reinstatement application developed by the secretary of
state and approved by the attorney general and upon any of the following:
(1) For a person whose registration is suspended for a state felony conviction
or for an out of state felony conviction when probation or parole has been transferred
to the state of Louisiana, the person is no longer identified on a report provided to
the registrar by the Department of State pursuant to R.S. 18:171(C).
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1031 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 361
(2) The registrar receives notice that a judgment of conviction for which the
registration was suspended was overturned or vacated pursuant to R.S. 18:171(D) or
171.1(D).
(3) The registrar receives when the person appears in the office of the
registrar and provides documentation from the appropriate correction official
showing that such the person is no longer under an order of imprisonment or, if the
person is under such an order, that the person has not been incarcerated pursuant to
the order within the last five years and the person is not under an order of
imprisonment related to a felony conviction pursuant to election fraud or any other
election offense pursuant to R.S. 18:1461.2. Such documentation may be delivered
by mail, facsimile, commercial carrier, or hand delivery, or by electronic submission
in a method approved by the secretary of state.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, such
documentation may be provided by mail, facsimile, commercial carrier, or hand
delivery for the following:
(a) A person who has been approved by the parish board of election
supervisors as being eligible to participate in the Special Program for Handicapped
Voters as such program existed prior to January 1, 2010.
(b) A person who has submitted to the registrar current proof of disability
from a physician along with a certification from the physician indicating that by
reason of the person's disability the person is unable to appear in person to vote
either during early voting or at the polling place on election day.
* * *